Wyoming, session 2025, HB0338.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 28-8-105 by creating a new subsection
(e) is amended to read:

28-8-105. Duties of director and staff; prefiling
bills; fiscal notes.

HB0338

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0787
(e) Not less than one (1) time per day on each
legislative day during a legislative session, the
legislative service office shall publish or update a list
of all internet domain names as defined in W.S.
41-12-401(a)(vii) and internet protocol addresses that are
being quarantined or prevented from delivering email to
legislators in any way. Any person whose email
communications to legislators have been quarantined by the
legislative service office may contact the legislative
service office to request that their current and future
emails be removed from quarantine and delivered to
legislators. The legislative service office shall remove
requested domain names or internet protocol addresses from
quarantine and allow delivery from the name or address
within two (2) days of receipt of the request unless the
release from quarantine or allowed delivery poses an
actual, articulable security threat to the information
technology systems of the state of Wyoming.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0338